Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
ARTICLE 4
CONSTRUCTION OF STATUTES

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 1 of chapter 135, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1973, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1973, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

anons of Statutory

C

onstruction", see 46 Colo. Law. 23 (Feb. 2017).

Section

PART 1 CONSTRUCTION OF WORDS AND PHRASES

PART 2 CONSTRUCTION OF STATUTES

PART 3 AMENDATORY STATUTES

PART 4 DEFINITIONS